test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_E.EHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehlga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehlgang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+DIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehlgan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehls
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehlang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlganggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehlgangang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgaangaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xál k̲áat'eehläsaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xál k̲áat'eehläs
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehläsaang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehläsga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehläsaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehläsaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asa'áa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asa'áang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaasdláa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaasdláang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'uuj
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xál k̲áat'eehläsaa'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'ujaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'uujaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehläsaa'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehläsaa'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehläseehl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'uu
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'wägan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'waang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'waa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'wägiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'wägaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'wägaangaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäs
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'uuj
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaa'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ujaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'uujaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaa'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ahlanggan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaa'ahlang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa'ahl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waaäseehl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'angga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'anggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'angang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'anggaangaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäs
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaa'áng
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaa'ánggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehlang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'uuj
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaa'uujang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'ujaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'uujaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaa'us
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'aang'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aang'ahlanggan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäsaa'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aang'ahlans
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaa'ahlang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'aang'ahl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'angäseehl
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'uu
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'wägan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'aawaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'aawaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'aawaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'aawaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'ang'waa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'ang'waang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehlgang'ang'waa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'wägiinii
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'wägaangaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'wägaangaan
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäsaa
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäs
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäsaang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäsga
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäsaas
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xál k̲áat'eehl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     xál k̲áat'e.ehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: xál k̲áat'eehl'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
